Indiana, session 2026, SB260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-37-10-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.150-2011,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Money paid into the fund shall be
appropriated for the following purposes:
(1) To supplement the cost required to abandon a well that has
had a permit revoked under IC 14-37-13-1.
(2) To cover the costs of remedial plugging and repairing of wells
under IC 14-37-8, including the expenses of remedial action
under IC 14-37-8-15.
(3) To cover the cost to:
(A) mitigate environmental damage; or
(B) protect public safety against harm;
caused by a well regulated under this article or the carbon
sequestration pilot project established under IC 14-39-1.
(4) Pipeline safety.
(5) To monitor or manage the carbon sequestration pilot
project established under IC 14-39-1.
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


(b) The director may make expenditures from the fund for
emergency purposes under section 6 of this chapter without the prior
approval of the budget agency or the governor. An expenditure under
this subsection may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(c) The director may establish a program to reimburse an applicant
for the reasonable expenses of remedial action incurred under
IC 14-37-8-15. The director may make expenditures from the fund for
this purpose and may establish any necessary guidelines and
procedures to administer the program.
SECTION 2. IC 14-39-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 132, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline company that seeks to construct, operate, and
maintain a carbon dioxide pipeline in Indiana must apply to the
department for issuance of a carbon dioxide transmission pipeline
certificate of authority. The department shall prescribe the form of the
application, which must:
(1) include a filing fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(2) be signed by a responsible officer of the company;
(3) include a statement verifying that the information submitted
is true, accurate, and complete to the best of that responsible
officer's knowledge and belief; and
(4) include a risk assessment with respect to the proposed
carbon dioxide transmission pipeline that includes scenario
modeling;
(5) include an estimate of the amount of carbon dioxide to be
injected into underground strata and formations for the
period of the certificate of authority; and
(4) (6) include all information necessary for the department to
find the following:
(A) That the applicant, or the contractor or subcontractor of
the applicant, has the financial, managerial, and technical
ability to construct, operate, and maintain a carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline in Indiana.
(B) That the applicant, or the contractor or subcontractor of the
applicant, has the requisite experience constructing, operating,
and maintaining a transmission pipeline.
(C) That the applicant has entered into a contract to transport
carbon dioxide by pipeline in Indiana with:
(i) at least one (1) producer of carbon dioxide located in
Indiana; and
(ii) unless all of the carbon dioxide to be transported in the
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


proposed carbon dioxide transmission pipeline is for the
applicant's own use or account, at least one (1) end user or
storer of carbon dioxide.
(D) That the applicant has provided documentation to the
department showing the proposed length, diameter, and
location of the proposed carbon dioxide transmission pipeline
in Indiana.
(E) That the applicant will construct, operate, and maintain the
proposed carbon dioxide transmission pipeline in accordance
with applicable local, state, and federal law, including federal
and state safety regulations and rules governing the
construction, operation, and maintenance of carbon dioxide
transmission pipelines, and related facilities and equipment, to
ensure the safety of pipeline employees and the public.
(F) That the applicant has signed a statement indicating that
the applicant agrees to construct a proposed carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline in a manner compliant with the
guidelines adopted under IC 8-1-22.6-8 by the pipeline safety
division of the Indiana utility regulatory commission.
(b) The department shall review an application filed under
subsection (a). Subject to subsection (f), if the department determines
that the application is incomplete or inaccurate, or both, the department
shall return the application to the applicant, informing the applicant in
writing of the applicant's right to file a corrected application with the
department. If the department determines that the application is
complete and accurate, the department shall provide notice to the
applicant of:
(1) that determination; and
(2) the date, time, and location of the public information meeting
to be held under subsection (d).
(c) The applicant shall:
(1) upon receipt of a notice under subsection (b):
(A) place for public inspection a copy of the application in a
public library located in each county in which the carbon
dioxide transmission pipeline is proposed to be located; and
(B) publish notice, in the same manner that would be required
if the applicant were subject to IC 5-3-1, in each county in
which the carbon dioxide transmission pipeline is proposed to
be located, of:
(i) the name and address of each library in which a copy of
the application is placed under clause (A); and
(ii) the date, time, and location of the public information
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


meeting to be held under subsection (d);
(2) provide to the department proof of publication of notice under
subdivision (1)(B); and
(3) have a representative present at the public information
meeting held under subsection (d).
(d) The department shall:
(1) conduct a public information meeting in the county seat of one
(1) of the counties, as determined by the department, in which the
proposed carbon dioxide transmission pipeline will be located;
and
(2) provide an opportunity at the meeting for members of the
public to be briefed and to ask questions about the proposed
carbon dioxide transmission pipeline.
(e) Not later than ninety (90) days after the public information
meeting held under subsection (d), the department shall notify the
applicant in writing that:
(1) the department:
(A) has made the findings described in subsection (a)(4);
(a)(6); and
(B) has approved the application; or
(2) the department:
(A) has determined that the department is unable to make the
findings described in subsection (a)(4); (a)(6); and
(B) has disapproved the application.
(f) The department shall process a corrected application that is filed
as permitted under subsection (b) in the same manner the department
processes an initially filed application under subsection (a).
(g) If the department fails to act under subsection (e) not later than
ninety (90) days after the public information meeting held under
subsection (d), the application is considered to be approved by the
department.
(h) If:
(1) the department approves the application under subsection
(e)(1); or
(2) the application is considered to be approved as described in
subsection (g);
the department shall issue to the applicant a carbon dioxide
transmission pipeline certificate of authority.
SECTION 3. IC 14-39-1-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) A carbon dioxide transmission pipeline
company that exercises the authority set forth in section 7(a) of this
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


chapter shall:
(1) compensate the property owner by making a payment to the
owner equal to:
(A) one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the fair market
value of the interest in the property acquired, if the
right-of-way or easement involves agricultural land; or
(B) one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the fair market value
of the interest in the property acquired, if the right-of-way or
easement involves a parcel of property occupied by the owner
as a residence; and
(2) pay to the property owner:
(A) any damages determined under IC 32-24-1; and
(B) any loss incurred in a trade or business;
that are attributable to the exercise of eminent domain.
(b) In determining the compensation to be paid to the owner of
property condemned under this chapter, proof may be offered and
consideration must be given to the present day diminution in value
of the residue of the property, if any, caused by the perceived risk
of a hazardous condition related to the carbon sequestration pilot
project.
SECTION 4. IC 14-39-1-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) An operator of a carbon
sequestration pilot project shall pay the department a fee for every
ton of carbon dioxide injected into underground strata and
formations.
(b) An operator of a carbon sequestration pilot project shall pay
annually to the department a fee of eight cents ($0.08) per ton of
carbon dioxide estimated to be injected into underground strata
and formations by:
(1) the estimate provided under section 4(a)(5) of this chapter;
or
(2) another document provided to the department by the
operator.
(c) An operator of a carbon sequestration pilot project shall
reconcile the previous calendar year's payment with the volume of
carbon dioxide actually injected into underground strata and
formations in the previous calendar year. The operator of the
carbon sequestration pilot project shall submit payment for the
amount of carbon dioxide injected into underground strata and
formations less the amount paid the previous calendar year.
(d) The department shall refund an operator of a carbon
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


sequestration pilot project any overpayment in the current year
from the previous calendar year.
SECTION 5. IC 14-39-1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 134, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The department shall
deposit fee revenue received under section sections 4(a)(1) and 11.5
of this chapter in the carbon sequestration project program
administrative fund established by IC 14-39-2-10.5.
(b) Fee revenue collected under section 11.5 of this chapter:
(1) may only be used to monitor or manage carbon
sequestration pilot projects approved under this chapter; and
(2) may not be considered for purposes of calculating the total
amount of money in the carbon sequestration project
program administrative fund under IC 14-39-2-10.5.
SECTION 6. IC 14-39-1-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Because the public interest would be
served by the state of Indiana succeeding to the rights of a person that
has conducted the underground storage of carbon dioxide, the state of
Indiana, upon the recommendation of the director of the department
and review by the state budget committee, may obtain ownership of:
(1) the carbon dioxide stored in underground strata and
formations; and
(2) the underground strata and formations in which the carbon
dioxide is stored;
from the operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project.
(b) The state of Indiana may obtain ownership of the carbon dioxide
stored in underground strata and formations and the underground strata
and formations in which the carbon dioxide is stored under this section:
(1) after the operator, through the carbon sequestration pilot
project, has injected carbon dioxide into underground strata and
formations for at least twelve (12) years; or
(2) after the operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project
ceases to inject carbon dioxide into underground strata and
formations, if the injection ceases less than twelve (12) years after
it began.
(c) A transfer of ownership under this section does not relieve
the operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project from liability
for any negligence or willful misconduct related to the carbon
sequestration pilot project that occurred before the transfer.
SECTION 7. IC 14-39-1-19 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


1, 2026]: Sec. 19. The department shall inspect the carbon
sequestration pilot project at reasonable times and to the extent
reasonably necessary to ensure the safety of the carbon
sequestration pilot project.
SECTION 8. IC 14-39-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 135, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) If at least two (2) pore space
owners own pore space located within a proposed carbon dioxide
storage area of a storage facility, the owners may agree to integrate
their interests to develop the pore space as a proposed storage facility
for the underground storage of carbon dioxide.
(b) If all of the owners of the pore space under subsection (a) do not
agree to integrate their interests, the department may issue an order
requiring the owners to integrate their interests and to develop the pore
space as a proposed storage facility for the underground storage of
carbon dioxide to serve the public interest, prevent waste, protect
correlative rights, and facilitate the efficient and effective use of natural
resources subject to the findings under subsection (c).
(c) Before issuing an order under subsection (b), the department
must make the following findings:
(1) That a storage operator:
(A) filed a complete application for a UIC Class VI permit or
a complete application for an amended UIC Class VI permit;
and
(B) submitted all the necessary information to the United
States Environmental Protection Agency for the agency to
process the storage operator's permit application.
(2) That the storage operator has made a good faith effort to
obtain the consent of all pore space owners located within the
proposed storage facility.
(3) That the storage operator has obtained the consent of the
owners of the pore space underlying at least seventy percent
(70%) of the surface area above the proposed storage facility or
amended proposed storage facility.
(3) That the storage operator has obtained both the consent
required under STEP THREE (i) and the consent required
under STEP THREE (ii) of the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the total amount of pore space
located within the proposed storage facility or amended
proposed storage facility.
STEP TWO: Determine the amount of pore space that is:
(i) located within the proposed storage facility or
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


amended proposed storage facility; and
(ii) owned by a resident of the county in which the
proposed storage facility or amended proposed storage
facility is located.
STEP THREE: The storage operator must obtain both of
the following:
(i) Consent from county resident owners of at least
seventy percent (70%) of the pore space determined
under STEP TWO.
(ii) Consent from the owners of at least seventy percent
(70%) of the total amount of pore space determined
under STEP ONE.
(4) That all pore space owners who do not agree to integrate their
interests to develop the pore space as a proposed storage facility
for the underground storage of carbon dioxide are equitably
compensated.
(d) A right to pore space granted by this section does not confer a
right to enter upon, or otherwise use, the surface of the land which is
integrated under this section unless provided in an order requiring the
owners to integrate their interests and to develop the pore space as a
proposed storage facility for the underground storage of carbon
dioxide.
(e) An involuntary integration order issued by the department takes
effect fifteen (15) days after the applicant is issued a UIC Class VI
permit or an amended UIC Class VI permit, as applicable.
SECTION 9. IC 32-24-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.291-2019,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section, "favored
proceeding" means a proceeding under this chapter to:
(1) acquire the right to explore and examine a subsurface
stratum or formation in land; and
(2) create the right of ingress and egress for operations
connected to the acquisition.
(a) (b) A person, firm, limited liability company, municipal
corporation, or other corporation authorized to do business in Indiana
and engaged in the business of transporting or distributing gas by
means of pipelines into, within, or through Indiana for ultimate public
use may condemn:
(1) land subsurface strata or formations;
(2) other necessary land rights;
(3) land improvements and fixtures, in or on land, except
buildings of any nature; and
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


(4) the use and occupation of land subsurface strata or formations;
for constructing, maintaining, drilling, utilizing, and operating an
underground gas storage reservoir.
(b) (c) The operator of the carbon sequestration pilot project
established under IC 14-39-1 may exercise the power of eminent
domain to obtain:
(1) ownership of such underground strata and formations located
under the surface of the owner's property as may be necessary or
useful for underground storage of carbon dioxide in the strata or
formations; and
(2) ownership or other rights to one (1) or more areas of the
surface of the owner's property, including but not limited to one
(1) or more rights-of-way or easements, as may be necessary or
useful for constructing, maintaining, using, operating, and gaining
access to monitoring facilities required by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency for the underground storage of
carbon dioxide.
(c) (d) The following rights in land may be condemned for use in
connection with the underground storage of gas:
(1) To drill and operate wells in and on land.
(2) To install and operate pipelines.
(3) To install and operate equipment, machinery, fixtures, and
communication facilities.
(4) To create ingress and egress to explore and examine
subsurface strata or underground formations.
(5) To create ingress and egress to construct, alter, repair,
maintain, and operate an underground storage reservoir.
(6) To exclusively use any subsurface strata condemned.
(7) To remove and reinstall pipe and other equipment used in
connection with rights condemned under subdivisions (1) through
(6).
(d) (e) Acquisition of subsurface rights in land for gas storage
purposes or for purposes of the carbon sequestration pilot project
established under IC 14-39-1 by condemnation under this section must
be without prejudice to any subsequent proceedings that may be
necessary under this section to acquire additional subsurface rights in
the same land for use in connection with the underground storage.
Surface rights in land necessary for the accomplishment of the
purposes set forth in this section may be condemned.
(e) (f) Except with respect to a proceeding under this chapter to:
(1) acquire the right to explore and examine a subsurface stratum
or formation in land; and
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


(2) create the right of ingress and egress for operations connected
to the acquisition;
favored proceeding and subject to subsection (f), (h), as a condition
precedent to the exercise of the right to condemn any underground
stratum, formation, or interest reasonably expected to be used or useful
for underground gas storage, or for purposes of the carbon
sequestration pilot project established under IC 14-39-1, a condemnor
first must have acquired by purchase, option, lease, or other a method
not involving condemnation, the right, or right upon the exercise of an
option, if any, to store gas in at least sixty per cent percent (60%) of
the stratum or formation. This must be computed in relation to the total
surface acreage overlying the entire stratum or formation considered
useful for the purpose.
(g) Except with respect to a favored proceeding and subject to
subsection (h), as a condition precedent to the exercise of the right
to condemn any underground stratum, formation, or interest
reasonably expected to be used for purposes of the carbon
sequestration pilot project established under IC 14-39-1, a
condemnor first must have obtained both the consent required
under STEP THREE (A) and the consent required under STEP
THREE (B) of the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the total size of the stratum or
formation.
STEP TWO: Determine the percentage of stratum or
formation that is owned by a resident of the county in which
the stratum or formation is located.
STEP THREE: The condemnor must obtain both of the
following by a method not involving condemnation:
(A) Consent from county resident owners of at least sixty
percent (60%) of the stratum or formation determined
under STEP TWO to store gas in the stratum or
formation.
(B) Consent from the owners of at least sixty percent
(60%) of the total stratum or formation determined under
STEP ONE to store gas in the stratum or formation.
In making a calculation under this subsection, the percentage of
stratum or formation acquired must be computed in relation to the
total surface acreage overlying the entire stratum or formation
considered useful for the purpose.
(f) (h) A tract under which the stratum or formation sought to be
condemned is owned by two (2) or more persons, firms, limited
liability companies, or corporations must be credited to the condemnor
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150


as acquired by it for the purpose of computing the percentage of
acreage acquired by the condemnor in complying with the requirement
of subsection (e) subsections (f) and (g) if the condemnor acquires
from the owner or owners of an undivided three-fourths (3/4) part or
interest or more of the underground stratum or formation, by purchase,
option, lease, or other method not involving condemnation, the right,
or right upon the exercise of an option, if any, to store gas in the
stratum or formation. It is not necessary for the condemnor to have
acquired any interest in the property in which the condemnee has an
interest before instituting a proceeding under this chapter.
2026 IN 260—LS 6742/DI 150